Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 14

Name

48-14-101. Corporate name.

A corporate name:

Must contain the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” “company,” or the abbreviation “corp.,” “inc.,” “co.,” or words or abbreviations of like import in another language (provided they are written in roman characters or letters); provided, that, if such corporation is formed for the purpose of an insurance or banking business, the name of such corporation need not contain any of the aforementioned words or abbreviations. A corporation using the corporate designations “limited” or “ltd.,” with such having been filed in the secretary of state's office prior to May 29, 1989, may continue to use that corporate designation until such time as it files an amendment which in any way changes its corporate name; and

May not contain language stating or implying that the corporation:

Transacts or has power to transact any business for which authorization in whatever form and however denominated is required under the laws of this state, unless the appropriate commission or officer has granted such authorization and certifies that fact in writing;

Is organized as, affiliated with, or sponsored by, any fraternal, veterans', service, religious, charitable, or professional organization, unless that fact is certified in writing by the organization with which affiliation or sponsorship is claimed;

Is an agency or instrumentality of, affiliated with or sponsored by the United States or the state of Tennessee or a subdivision or agency thereof, unless such fact is certified in writing by the appropriate official of the United States or the state of Tennessee or subdivision or agency thereof; or

Is organized for a purpose other than that permitted by § 48-13-101 and its charter.

Except as authorized by subsection (c), the name of a domestic corporation, and the name of a foreign corporation that is authorized to transact business in this state or is applying for a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, shall be distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the respective names of or for every other entity, whether true, assumed, reserved or registered, to the extent the use or reservation of such names is evidenced by a filing with the secretary of state under applicable law.

A domestic or foreign corporation, or person acting on behalf of a corporation not yet formed, may apply to the secretary of state for authorization to use a name that is not distinguishable upon the secretary of state's records from one (1) or more of the names described in subsection (b). The secretary of state shall authorize use of the indistinguishable name applied for, if:

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (b) consents to the use in writing and submits an undertaking, in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state, to cancel its reservation of such name or change such name to a name that is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the name of the applicant;

The applicant delivers to the secretary of state a certified copy of the final judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction establishing the applicant's right to use the name applied for in this state; or

The person holding the right to use the previously filed name described in subsection (b) consents in writing to the use of such name by the applicant, and both the other person and the applicant consent in a form satisfactory to the secretary of state to use the same registered agent.

A domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business or applying for a certificate of authority to transact business may elect to adopt an assumed corporate name that complies with the requirements of subsections (a)-(c), except that such name need not contain the corporate designations contained in subdivision (a)(1).

As used in chapters 11-27 of this title, “assumed corporate name” means any name used by the corporation other than its true corporate name, except that the following shall not constitute the use of an assumed corporate name under chapters 11-27 of this title:

The identification by a corporation of its business with a trademark or service mark of which it is the owner or licensed user; and

The use of a name of a division, not separately incorporated and not containing the word “corporation,” “incorporated,” or “limited” or an abbreviation of one (1) of such words; provided, that the corporation also clearly discloses its corporate name.

Before transacting any business in this state under an assumed corporate name or names, the corporation shall, for each assumed corporate name, pursuant to resolution by its board of directors, execute and file in accordance with chapter 11, part 3 of this title, an application setting forth:

The true corporate name;

The state or country under the laws of which it is organized;

That it intends to transact business under an assumed corporate name; and

The assumed corporate name which it proposes to use.

The right to use an assumed corporate name shall be effective for five (5) years from the date of filing with the secretary of state.

A corporation shall renew the right to use its assumed corporate name or names, if any, within the two (2) months preceding the expiration of such right, for a period of five (5) years, by filing an application to renew each assumed name and paying the renewal fee as prescribed by § 48-11-303(a).

Any domestic or foreign corporation may, pursuant to resolution by its board of directors, change or cancel any or all of its assumed corporate names by executing and filing, in accordance with chapter 11, part 3 of this title, an application setting forth:

The true corporate name;

The state or country under the laws of which it is organized;

That it intends to cease transacting business under an assumed corporate name by changing or cancelling it;

The assumed corporate name to be changed from or cancelled; and

If the assumed corporate name is to be changed, the assumed corporate name which the corporation proposes to use.

Upon the filing of an application to change an assumed corporate name, the corporation shall have the right to use such assumed corporate name for the period authorized by subsection (d).

The right to use an assumed corporate name shall be cancelled by the secretary of state:

If the corporation fails to renew an assumed corporate name;

If the corporation has filed an application to change or cancel an assumed corporate name;

If a domestic corporation has been dissolved; or

If a foreign corporation has had its certificate of authority to transact business in this state revoked.

Nothing in this section, or in § 48-14-102, § 48-14-103 or § 48-25-106, shall abrogate or limit the law as to unfair competition or unfair trade practice, or derogate from the common law, the principles of equity, or the statutes of this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect trade names and trademarks.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 4.01; 1987, ch. 273, §§ 25, 26; 1989, ch. 451, § 4; 1994, ch. 868, §§ 2-5; 1997, ch. 224, § 1; 2010, ch. 743, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Applicability of business corporation law, title 48, chs. 11-27, to corporations existing on January 1, 1988, title 48, ch. 27.

Documents filed with county register of deeds in addition to the secretary of state's office, § 48-11-303.

Foreign limited liability companies, title 48, chapter 246, part 2.

Nonprofit corporations, name, title 48, ch. 54.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-504 — 5-506, 5-905.

Law Reviews.

Bad Faith in Cyberspace: Trademark Rights on the World Wide Web (Chad Denver Emerson), 36 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2000).

48-14-102. Reserved name.

A person may reserve the exclusive use of a corporate name, including an assumed corporate name, by delivering an application to the secretary of state for filing. The application must set forth the name and address of the applicant and the name proposed to be reserved. If the secretary of state finds that the corporate name applied for meets the requirements of § 48-14-101 and is available, the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the applicant's exclusive use for a four-month period. Upon the expiration of the four-month period, the same or any other party may apply to reserve the same name.

The owner of a reserved corporate name, including an assumed corporate name, may transfer the reservation to another person by delivering to the secretary of state a notice of the transfer signed by the owner that states the name and address of the transferee.

The reservation of a specific name may be cancelled by filing with the secretary of state a notice, executed by the applicant or transferee, specifying the name reservation to be cancelled and the name and address of the applicant or transferee.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 4.02; 1987, ch. 273, § 27; 1989, ch. 451, § 5.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-501 — 5-503.

48-14-103. Registered name.

A foreign corporation may register its corporate name, or an assumed corporate name under which it transacts business, or its corporate name with any addition pursuant to § 48-25-106, if the name is distinguishable upon the records of the secretary of state from the corporate names that are not available under § 48-14-101(b).

A foreign corporation registers its corporate name, or its assumed corporate name, or its corporate name with any addition pursuant to § 48-25-106, by delivering to the secretary of state for filing an application:

Setting forth its corporate name, its assumed corporate name, or its corporate name with any addition pursuant to § 48-25-106, the state or country and date of its incorporation, and a brief description of the nature of the business in which it is engaged; and

Accompanied by a certificate of existence (or a document of similar import) from the state or country of incorporation, which certificate shall bear a date of not more than one (1) month prior to the date the application is filed in this state.

The name is registered for the applicant's exclusive use upon the effective date of the application and until the end of the calendar year in which such registration occurs.

A foreign corporation whose registration is effective may renew it for successive years by delivering to the secretary of state for filing a renewal application, which complies with the requirements of subsection (b), between October 1 and December 31 of the preceding year. The renewal application renews the registration for the following calendar year.

A foreign corporation whose registration is effective may thereafter qualify as a foreign corporation under that name or consent in writing to the use of that name by a corporation thereafter incorporated under chapters 11-27 of this title or by another foreign corporation thereafter authorized to transact business in this state. The registration terminates when the domestic corporation is incorporated or the foreign corporation qualifies or consents to the qualification of another foreign corporation under the registered name.

Acts 1986, ch. 887, § 4.03; 1987, ch. 273, § 28.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-507, 5-508.